New York, session 2025-2026, A1900.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2805 of the public health law is amended by adding 2 a new subdivision 3 to read as follows: 3 3. The commissioner shall report quarterly on hospital compliance 4 with federal hospital price transparency law, rules and regulations. 5 Such report shall be conspicuously posted on the department's website. 6 § 2. Hospitals not in compliance with federal price transparency law, 7 rules and regulations shall be subject to penalties under section 12 of 8 the public health law. 9 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 10 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05296-01-5